Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.
ATTORNEYS]

§507-81 Attorney's lien upon actions and
judgments. (a) An attorney has a lien upon:

(1) Actions, suits, and proceedings after
commencement of the action or arbitration proceeding;

(2) Judgments, decrees, orders, settlements, and
awards entered by the court or an arbitrator in favor of the client; and

(3) Any proceeds paid in satisfaction of the
judgment, decree, order, settlement, or award.

(b) The lien shall be for:

(1) The fees and compensation specifically agreed
upon with the client;

(2) The reasonable value of the services of the
attorney, if there is no fee agreement;

(3) Any costs advanced by the attorney; and

(4) Any fees or commissions taxed or allowed by the
court.

(c) Except for tax liens, prior liens of record
on the real and personal property subject to the lien created by this section,
and as provided in section (d), the attorney's lien is superior to all other
liens.

(d) When the attorney's lien attaches to a
judgment, decree, order, settlement, or award allowing or enforcing a client's
lien, the attorney's lien has the same priority as the client's lien with
regard to personal or real property subject to the client's lien.

(e) The attorney's lien on a judgment, decree,
order, settlement, or award remains valid as long as the judgment, decree,
order, settlement, or award remains valid.

(f) To be enforceable under this section, a
notice of claim of the attorney's lien shall be filed with the court or
arbitrator, as the case may be.

(g) Except as provided by subsections (i) and
(j), the attorney's lien is not affected by a settlement between the parties to
the action, suit, or proceeding before or after the judgment, decree, order, or
award.

(h) Except as provided by subsections (i) and
(j), a party to the action, suit, or proceeding or any other person shall not
have the right to discharge or dismiss any judgment, decree, order, settlement,
or award entered in the action, suit, or proceeding until the lien and claim of
the attorney for fees based thereon is satisfied in full.

(i) A party may pay the full amount of a
judgment, decree, order, settlement, or award into court, and the clerk of the
court shall thereupon fully satisfy the judgment, decree, order, settlement, or
award on the record, and the party shall be thereby released from any further
claims thereunder.

(j) If more than one attorney from the same
firm appears of record for a party, the satisfaction of the lien created by
this section by one of the attorneys is conclusive evidence that the lien is
fully satisfied.

(k) Attorneys have the same right and power
over actions, suits, proceedings, judgments, decrees, orders, settlements, and
awards to enforce their liens as their clients have for the amount due thereon
to them. [L 2004, c 48, §2; am L 2011, c 136, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next